South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4175.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 9, Chapter 6, Title 12 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 12-6-1125. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, wages earned by a law enforcement officer while performing the duties of a law enforcement officer must not be included in the computation of South Carolina gross income. Further, no income taxes may be withheld on such wages of a law enforcement officer. For the purposes of this item, "law enforcement officer" means an officer or employee of the United States, a state, political subdivision of a state, or the District of Columbia, who is authorized to enforce laws. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and first applies to tax years beginning after 2024. ----XX----